Hawaii statutes.
[§171-173] Turtle Bay appraisal and due
diligence. Any appraisal and due diligence completed by the Hawaii tourism
authority may be used by the department of land and natural resources for the
acquisition of the Turtle Bay conservation easement and other real property
interests. [L 2015, c 121, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next